New York, session 2025-2026, S2001.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 410-x of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 11 to read as follows: 3 11. A social services district may provide child care assistance fund- 4 ed under the block grant for additional or different hours than a parent 5 or caretaker spends in work, training, educational activities or other 6 reasons for care designated by the social services district in its 7 consolidated services plan in accordance with paragraph (e) of subdivi- 8 sion one of section four hundred ten-w of this title, including, but not 9 limited to, paying for full-time child care assistance regardless of the 10 hours of the activity of the parent's or caretaker's reason for care. 11 § 2. Section 410-w of the social services law is amended by adding a 12 new subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 13 1-a. For all families eligible for child care assistance pursuant to 14 subdivision one of this section, a social services district is not 15 required to limit authorized child care services strictly based on the 16 hours during which the parent or caretaker is engaged in work, education 17 or other activity or the number of hours the parent or caretaker is 18 engaged in any such reasons for care. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05861-02-6